Utah statutes.
54-17-603.   Renewable energy certificate -- Issuance -- Use to satisfy
other requirements.
(1)  The commission shall establish a process for issuance or recognition of a
renewable energy certificate.
(2)  The commission process under Subsection (1) shall provide for the
issuance, monitoring, accounting, transfer, and use of a renewable energy
certificate, including in electronic form.
(3)  The commission may:
(a)  consult with another state or a federal agency and any regional system or
trading program to fulfill Subsection (1); and
(b)  allow use of a renewable energy certificate that is issued, monitored,
accounted for, or transferred by or through a regional system or trading
program, including the Western Renewable Energy Generation Information System,
to fulfill this part's provisions.
(4)  A renewable energy certificate shall be issued for:
(a)  qualifying electricity generated on and after January 1, 1995; and
(b)  the activities of an energy user described in Subsections
10-19-102(11)(e) and 54-17-601(10)(e) on and after January 1, 1995.
(5)  The person requesting a renewable energy certificate shall affirm that
the renewable energy attributes of the electricity have not been traded, sold,
transferred, or otherwise used to satisfy another state's renewable energy
requirements.
(6) (a)  For the purpose of satisfying Subsection 54-17-602(1) and the
issuance of a renewable energy certificate under this section, a renewable
energy source located in this state that derives its energy from solar
photovoltaic or solar thermal energy shall be credited for 2.4 kilowatt-hours
of qualifying electricity for each 1.0 kilowatt-hour generated.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (6)(a), the acquisition or construction by an
electrical corporation of a renewable energy source that derives its energy
from solar photovoltaic or solar thermal energy shall comply with the cost-
effectiveness criteria of Subsection 54-17-201(2)(c)(ii).
(7)  A renewable energy certificate issued under this section:
(a)  does not expire; and
(b)  may be banked.
(8)  The commission may recognize a renewable energy certificate that is
issued, monitored, accounted for, or transferred by or through another state
or a regional system or trading program, including the Western Renewable
Energy Generation Information System, if the renewable energy certificate is
for qualifying electricity.
(9)  A renewable energy certificate:
(a)  may be used only once to satisfy Subsection 54-17-602(1);
(b)  may be used for the purpose of Subsection 54-17-602(1) and the qualifying
electricity on which the renewable energy certificate is based may be used to
satisfy any federal renewable energy requirement; and
(c)  may not be used if it has been used to satisfy any other state's
renewable energy requirement.
(10)  The commission shall establish procedures and reasonable rates
permitting an electrical corporation that is a purchasing utility under
Section 54-12-2 to acquire or retain a renewable energy certificate associated
with the purchase of power from an independent energy producer.
